Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 1 Fiscal Functions of Department of Administration

35-1-1.
Approval of agreements with federal agencies.

No department or agency of the state shall enter into an agreement with a federal agency involving state funds without the approval of the director of the office of management and budget or his or her duly authorized agents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 73; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-1-1

; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 6.

35-1-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 75; P.L. 1947, ch. 1876, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-1-2

; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, § 5, effective July 1, 2006.

35-1-3.
Succession to powers of previous officers.

Wherever, in any general law, public law, or resolution of the general assembly, or in any document, record, instrument, or proceeding authorized by any law or resolution, the words “state auditor” or any reference to “state auditor” appears, or the words “deputy state auditor” appear, or the words “state commissioner of finance” and “state comptroller” appear, the words or reference shall be construed to mean the director of administration, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1318, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 42; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-1-3

.

35-1-4.
Agencies subject to fiscal supervision.

The term “department and agency”, as used in this title, shall be deemed to include and be interpreted to mean any department, division, board, commission, commissioner, committee, agent, officer, person, or institution for whom an appropriation is made, or who is authorized to expend or to collect money for the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 981, § 11; P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 43; G.L. 1956, §

35-1-4

.

35-1-5.
Quarterly financial reporting.

The director of administration shall direct the state controller to prepare and report quarterly financial statements regarding the financial condition of the state, including actual revenue collections compared to the estimates upon which the budget was based, and actual departmental expenditures and encumbrances compared to appropriations. Furthermore, the director shall direct the state budget officer to project on a quarterly basis the anticipated year end balance assuming current trends continue and that typical cyclical expenditure patterns prevail over the course of the year. A consolidated quarterly report incorporating the current status and projection shall be released to the public, with copies provided to the chairperson of the House Finance Committee, chairperson of the senate finance committee, house fiscal advisor, and senate fiscal advisor, within forty-five (45) calendar days of the end of each quarter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 77, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 1, § 17.